Hawaii statutes.
§508D-2 Applicability. Except as
otherwise provided for in this chapter, this chapter applies to any sale of
residential real property. The failure of the seller or the seller's agent to
comply with this chapter shall not affect the validity of title to any
residential real property sold. [L 1994, c 214, pt of §2; am L 1996, c 161, §2]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next